Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Pawnbrokers Act of 1988

45-6-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Pawnbrokers Act of 1988.”

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 1.

Cross-References. Buyer of goods, §47-9-320.

Commercial instruments and transactions, title 47.

Disposition of collateral after default, §47-9-610.

Sales of dangerous weapons, certification of purchaser, exceptions, licensing of dealers, §39-17-1316.

Uniform Commercial Code, leases, title 47, ch. 2A.

Attorney General Opinions. Pawnbroker compliance with scrap jewelry and metal dealers act. OAG 12-101, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (10/31/12).

45-6-202. Purpose.

The making of pawn loans and the acquisition and disposition of tangible personal property by and through pawnshops vitally affects the general economy of this state and the public interest and welfare of its citizens. It is the policy of this state and the purpose of this part to:

Ensure a sound system of making loans and acquiring and disposing of tangible personal property by and through pawnshops and to prevent unlawful property transactions, particularly in stolen property, through licensing and regulating pawnbrokers and certain persons employed by or in pawnshops;

Provide for licensing fees, investigation fees, and minimum capital requirements of licensees;

Ensure financial responsibility to the state and the public;

Ensure compliance with federal and state laws; and

Assist local governments in the exercise of their police power.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 2.

45-6-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dealer and trader” means a person who holds a current certificate of registration with the department of revenue pursuant to title 67, chapter 6, part 6;

“Maturity date of pawn transaction” means the date the pawn transaction is due to be paid, which date shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the date of the pawn transaction;

“Net assets” means the book value of the current assets of a person or pawnbroker less its applicable liabilities as stated in this subdivision (3);

“Applicable liabilities” includes trade or other accounts payable; accrued sales, income, or other taxes; accrued expenses and notes or other payables that are unsecured or secured in whole or in part by current assets. “Applicable liabilities” does not include liabilities secured by assets other than current assets;

“Current assets” includes the investments made in cash, bank deposits, merchandise inventory, and loans due from customers excluding the pawnshop charge. “Current assets” do not include the investments made in fixed assets of real estate, furniture, fixtures, or equipment, investments made in stocks, bonds, or other securities or investments made in prepaid expenses or other general intangibles; and

“Net assets” must be represented by a capital investment unencumbered by any liens or other encumbrances to be subject to the claims of general creditors. If the pawnshop is a corporation, the capital investment consists of common or preferred shares and capital or earned surplus, as those terms are defined by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, as amended; if it is any other form of business entity, the capital investment consists of a substantial equivalent of that of a corporation and is determined by generally accepted accounting principles;

“Pawn” or “pawn transaction” means either of the following transactions:

“Buy-sell” agreement means any agreement whereby a pawnbroker agrees to hold a property (pledged goods) for a specified period of time not to be less than sixty (60) days to allow the seller the exclusive right to repurchase the property. A buy-sell agreement is not a loan of money, but shall still meet all recording procedures to law enforcement officers as with a pawn transaction; or

“Loan of money” transaction means any loan on the security of pledged goods and being a written bailment of pledged goods as a security lien for the loan, for the cash advanced, interest and fees authorized by Acts 1995, ch. 186, redeemable on certain terms and with the implied power of sale on default;

For purposes of all state and federal bankruptcy laws, a pledgor's interest in the pledgor's pledged goods during the pendency of a pawn transaction shall be deemed to be that of a right of redemption only;

“Pawnbroker” means any person, partnership or corporation engaged in the business of lending money on the security of pledged goods; or engaged in the business of purchasing tangible personal property on condition that it may be redeemed and repurchased by the seller for a fixed price within a fixed period of time; or engaged in the business of advancing money to a customer in consideration for the customer surrendering possession of tangible personal property on an agreement by which the property may be returned to the customer's possession on repayment of the money advanced; and engaged in the business of selling new and used tangible personal property, whether unredeemed tangible personal property resulting from a pawn transaction, or acquired by a purchase of tangible personal property not acquired in a pawn transaction or purchased merchandise for resale from dealers and traders;

“Pawnshop” means the location at which or premises in which a pawnbroker regularly conducts business;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, joint venture, association or any other legal entity however organized;

“Pledged goods” means tangible personal property, other than choses in action, securities, printed evidences of indebtedness or title documents, which tangible personal property is purchased by, deposited with, or otherwise actually delivered into the possession of a pawnbroker in connection with a pawn transaction, and includes “pawn” or “pledged property” or similar words; and

“Pledgor” means the pawn loan customer of the pawnbroker, entering into a pawn transaction with the pawnbroker.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 3; 1994, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 186, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 186, referred to in (2)(B), amended or enacted numerous sections in this title. Consult the Volume 13 tables for a translation.

Cross-References. Business Corporation Act, title 48, chs. 11-27.

Attorney General Opinions. Personal check as tangible personal property, OAG 98-012, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (1/9/98).

45-6-204. Authority of licensed pawnbrokers.

A pawnbroker licensed pursuant to this part has the power to:

Make loans on the security of pledged goods as a pawn or pawn transaction;

Purchase tangible personal property under a buy-sell agreement from individuals as a pawn or pawn transaction on the condition it may be redeemed or repurchased by the seller at a fixed price within a fixed time not to be less than sixty (60) days;

Lend money on bottomry and respondentia security, at marine interest;

Deal in bullion, stocks and public securities;

Make loans on real estate, stocks and personal property;

Purchase merchandise for resale from dealers and traders;

Make over-the-counter purchases of goods that the seller does not intend to buy back. The pawnbroker shall hold the goods for a period of not less than twenty (20) business days before offering the merchandise for resale; and

Use its capital and funds in any lawful manner within the general scope and purposes of its creation.

Notwithstanding this section, except for a pawn or pawn transaction authorized by Acts 1995, ch. 186, no pawnbroker shall have the power as enumerated in this section without first complying with the law regulating the particular transactions involved.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 4; 1995, ch. 186, § 3; 1997, ch. 409, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 186, referred to in (b), amended or enacted numerous provisions in this title. For disposition of the act, see the Volume 13 tables.

Attorney General Opinions. Pawnbroker compliance with scrap jewelry and metal dealers act. OAG 12-101, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (10/31/12).

45-6-205. License required.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to establish or conduct a business of pawnbroking unless the person, firm, or corporation has first procured a license to conduct the business in the manner and form as provided in this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 5.

45-6-206. Eligibility requirements for license.

To be eligible for a pawnbroker's license, an applicant must:

Be of good moral character;

Have net assets, as defined herein, of at least seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), readily available for use exclusively in conducting the business of each licensed pawnbroker;

Show that the business will be operated lawfully and fairly within the purpose of this part; and

Each licensed pawnbroker shall conform to the requirements set forth in § 45-6-221.

Despite a person's eligibility for a pawnbroker's license under subsection (a), the county clerk shall find ineligible an applicant who has a prior felony conviction within ten (10) years next preceding that:

Directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of the occupation of a pawnbroker; or

Otherwise makes the applicant presently unfit for a pawnbroker's license.

If an applicant for a pawnbroker's license is a business entity, the eligibility requirements of subsections (a) and (b) apply to each operator or beneficial owner, and as to a corporation, to each officer, shareholder, and director.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 6; 1994, ch. 935, § 1; 1995, ch. 186, § 4; 1997, ch. 409, § 4; 2012, ch. 778, § 2.

45-6-207. Petition for license — Fee for investigation.

Every person, firm or corporation desiring to engage in the business of pawnbroker shall petition the county clerk in the county in which the pawnbroker establishment is to be operated for a license to conduct the business.

The petitions shall provide:

The name of the person, and in case of a firm or corporation, the names of the persons composing the firm or of the officers and stockholders of the corporation;

The place, street, and number where business is to be carried on;

Specify the amount of net assets or capital proposed to be used by the petitioner in the business;

The signature of at least ten (10) freeholders, citizens of the county in which petitioner resides, of good reputation, certifying to the good reputation and moral character of the applicant or applicants;

The statement required in subdivision (b)(3) shall be accompanied by an unaudited statement from a certified public accountant and shall contain the following statement:

According to the information provided to me, the net assets, as defined in Tennessee Code Annotated, §45-6-203, or proposed capital to be used by the applicant, (name) in the pawnbroker business, are valued at not less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000);

An affidavit by petitioner that petitioner has not been convicted of a felony within the past ten (10) years, that directly affects the petitioner's ability to lawfully and fairly operate pursuant to this part;

A certificate from the chief of police and/or sheriff and/or the Tennessee bureau of investigation that petitioner is of good moral character and has not been convicted of a felony within the past ten (10) years; and

Certified funds in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable to the county clerk to defray the costs of investigation of the petition, plus to pay directly for the costs of the city, sheriff, and Tennessee bureau of investigation investigating the petitioner.

Acts 1988, ch, 724, § 7; 1993, ch. 229, § 1.

45-6-208. Granting of license — Transfer — Fee.

Every person, firm, or corporation having satisfied the provisions of §45-6-206 and having paid the business tax and any other taxes as provided by law, and having produced to the county clerk satisfactory evidence of good character as to being a suitable person or persons to carry on the business of pawnbroker, shall be granted a license as herein provided. The license issued hereunder shall state the name of the person, firm, or corporation to whom issued, the place of business and street number where the business is located and the amount of capital employed, and shall entitle the person receiving the same to do business at the place designated in the license. The license shall not be transferable from one (1) person to another, but may be transferred from one (1) place to another, by consent of the county clerk, on payment to the county clerk of a transfer fee of ten dollars ($10.00).

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 8.

45-6-209. Record of transactions required — Inspection — Fingerprinting.

Every pawnbroker shall keep a consecutively numbered record of each and every pawn transaction, which shall correspond in all essential particulars to the detachable pawn ticket attached. The consecutive numbering process for pawnbroker transactions dealing with over-the-counter purchases, described in § 45-6-204(a)(7) shall be numbered and identified independently from a buy-sell agreement and/or a loan of money transaction.

The pawnbroker shall, at the time of making the pawn transaction and/or buy-sell transaction, enter upon the pawnshop copy of the records as well as on the pawn ticket, and/or buy-sell ticket, the following information, which shall be typed or written in ink and in the English language:

A complete and accurate description of the pledged goods including, but not limited to, the following information, if applicable:

Brand name;

Model number;

Serial number, if issued by the manufacturer and not intentionally defaced, altered or removed;

Size;

Color, as apparent to the untrained eye, not applicable to diamonds;

Precious metal type, content and weight, if indicated;

Gemstone description, including the number of stones;

Any other unique identifying marks, numbers, names or letters; and

In the case of firearms, the type of action, caliber or gauge, number of barrels, barrel length, and finish;

The date of the pawn transaction;

The amount of cash loan advanced on the pawn transaction;

The exact value of property as stated by pledgor who pledges the property;

The maturity date of the pawn transaction, which date shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the date of the pawn transaction;

The name, race, sex, height, weight, date of birth, residence address and numbers from the items used as identification. Acceptable items of identification are one (1) of the following documents:

A state-issued driver license;

A state-issued identification card;

A passport;

A valid military identification;

A nonresident alien border crossing card;

A resident alien border crossing card; or

A United States immigration and naturalization service identification; and

As a pilot project, in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), and in any county having a population of not less than three hundred eighty-two thousand (382,000) nor more than three hundred eighty-two thousand one hundred (382,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the right thumbprint of the pledgor, provided that if taking the right thumbprint is not possible the pawnbroker shall take a fingerprint from the left thumb or another finger and shall identify on the pawn ticket which finger has been used. A thumb or fingerprint taken pursuant to this subdivision (b)(7) must be clear and complete and contain no smears or smudges. A thumb or fingerprint taken pursuant to this subdivision (b)(7) shall be maintained by the pawnbroker for a period of five (5) years from the date of the pawn transaction.

The pledgor shall sign the stub providing the pledgor's residence address and shall receive the detached pawn ticket; the stub shall also be signed by the pawnbroker.

These records shall be delivered to the appropriate law enforcement agency, by mail or in person, within forty-eight (48) hours following the day of the transactions. Delivery by mail shall be deemed made when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. Further, these records shall be made available for inspection each business day, except Sunday, by the sheriff of the county and the chief of police of the municipality in which the pawnshop is located.

These records shall be a correct copy of the entries made of the pawn transactions and/or buy-sell transactions and shall be carefully preserved without alteration and shall be available during regular business hours for inspection by the appropriate law enforcement officers as herein provided.

In any county having a population of more than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, each licensed pawnbroker shall retain these records for a period of one (1) year. After that time these records shall be delivered to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the county.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, in counties or municipalities that require a thumbprint pursuant to subdivision (b)(7), if the pawn transaction involves a firearm, the pawnbroker shall exclude from the information sent to law enforcement pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)-(6), the name, address and identification numbers required by subdivision (b)(6) of the pledgor pawning the firearm. The name, address and identification numbers of the pledgor shall remain with the pawnbroker along with the pledgor's thumbprint. A law enforcement officer inspecting a record involving a firearm pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) shall not take or record the name, address and identification numbers of the pledgor except pursuant to a subpoena as provided in subdivision (g)(2).

If a court grants the request of a law enforcement officer for a subpoena to require the production of the thumbprint of a pledgor taken and maintained pursuant to subdivision (b)(7) pursuant to the procedure set out in this section, the pawnbroker shall at the same time supply the law enforcement officer with the name, address and identification numbers of the pledgor whose thumbprint was subpoenaed.

It is an offense for a law enforcement officer or agency to use any information supplied by a pawnbroker pursuant to this section to create or maintain a separate registry, list or database of persons who own firearms.

A violation of subdivision (h)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 9; 1994, ch. 935, § 3; 1995, ch. 186, §§ 5, 6; 1997, ch. 409, § 3; 2001, ch. 429, §§ 1, 3; 2004, ch. 499, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. A city may not adopt an ordinance requiring the pledgor in a pawn transaction to place a thumbprint on the pawnbroker's copy of the pawn transaction, OAG 00-071, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (4/11/00).

45-6-210. Rate of interest — Other charges permitted.

In connection with and for a pawn or pawn transaction, no pawnbroker shall demand and receive a rate of interest greater than two percent (2%) per month of the amount of the loan advance under the pawn or pawn transaction, and no other charge of any description, for any purpose whatsoever, shall be made by the pawnbroker; except that the pawnbroker may charge, contract for and receive a fee not to exceed one-fifth (1/5) of the amount of the loan advance under the pawn or pawn transaction for investigating the title, storage, insuring the pledged goods, closing the loan, making daily reports to local law enforcement officers and for other expenses, losses of every nature whatsoever and for all other services. The fee when made and collected shall not be deemed interest for any purpose of law. The interest and fee shall be deemed to be earned, due and owing as of the date of the pawn transaction and a like sum shall be deemed earned, due and owing on the same day of each subsequent month.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 10; 1995, ch. 186, § 7.

45-6-211. Failure to redeem — Notice to pledgor.

In every pawn transaction made under a loan of money pawn transaction as defined in this part, the pawnbroker shall retain in the pawnbroker's possession the pledged goods for thirty (30) days after the maturity date of the pawn transaction. Pledged goods not redeemed by the pledgor on or before the maturity date of the pawn transaction set out in the pawn ticket issued in connection with any pawn transaction may be redeemed by the pledgor within the period of thirty (30) days after the maturity date of the pawn transaction by the payment of the originally agreed redemption price (interest, fee and loan amount), and the payment of the additional interest and fee for the period following the original maturity date due on the pawn transaction.

If the pledgor fails to redeem the pledged goods within thirty (30) days after the maturity date of the pawn transaction, the pledgor shall thereby forfeit all right, title and interest of, in and to the pledged goods to the pawnbroker, who shall thereby acquire an absolute title to the pledged goods and the debt becomes satisfied, and the pawnbroker shall have the authority to sell or dispose of the unredeemed pledged goods as the pawnbroker's own and may sell the unredeemed pledged goods.

If the pledgor loses the pawn ticket, the pledgor shall not thereby forfeit the right to redeem the pledged goods, but may promptly, before the lapse of the final redemption date, make affidavit for the loss, describing the pledged goods, which affidavit shall take the place of the pawn ticket, unless the pledged goods have already been redeemed under this part.

The following information shall be printed on all pawn tickets or buy-sell tickets:

ANY PERSONAL PROPERTY PLEDGED TO A PAWNBROKER WITHIN THIS STATE IS SUBJECT TO SALE OR DISPOSAL WHEN THERE HAS BEEN NO PAYMENT MADE ON THE ACCOUNT FOR A PERIOD OF THIRTY (30) DAYS AFTER THE MATURITY DATE OF THE PAWN TRANSACTION AND NO FURTHER NOTICE IS NECESSARY;

THE PLEDGOR OF THIS ITEM ATTESTS THAT IT IS NOT STOLEN, IT HAS NO LIENS OR ENCUMBRANCES AGAINST IT AND THE PLEDGOR HAS THE RIGHT TO SELL OR PAWN THE ITEM;

THE ITEM PAWNED IS REDEEMABLE ONLY BY THE BEARER OF THIS TICKET; and

A blank line for the pledgor's signature.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 11; 1995, ch. 186, § 8.

45-6-212. Prohibited actions.

A pawnbroker shall not:

Accept a pledge or purchase property from a person under eighteen (18) years of age, nor accept a pledge from anyone who appears intoxicated, nor from any person known to the pawnbroker to be a thief, or to have been convicted of larceny, burglary or robbery, without first notifying a police officer;

Make any agreement requiring the personal liability of a pledgor in connection with a pawn transaction;

Accept any waiver, in writing or otherwise, of any right or protection accorded a pledgor under this part;

Fail to exercise reasonable care to protect pledged goods from loss or damage;

Fail to return pledged goods to a pledgor upon payment of the full amount due the pawnbroker on the pawn transaction. In the event the pledged goods are lost or damaged while in the possession of the pawnbroker, it shall be the responsibility of the pawnbroker to replace the lost or damaged goods with like kind or kinds of merchandise. In the event the pledgor and pawnbroker cannot agree as to replacement with like kind or kinds, the pawnbroker shall reimburse the pledgor for the agreed upon value of the article as recited under § 45-6-209(b)(4);

Purchase property in a pawn transaction for the pawnbroker's own personal use;

Take any article in pawn, pledge, or as security or under a buy-sell agreement from any person, which article is known to the pawnbroker to be stolen;

Sell, exchange, barter, or remove from the pawnbroker's place of business, or permit to be redeemed any goods pledged, pawned, or disposed of by the pawnbroker for a period of forty-eight (48) hours after making the report as provided in § 45-6-209;

Keep more than one (1) house, shop, or place for the business of pawnbroker under one (1) license; provided, that the person may remove from one (1) place of business to another, as provided in § 45-6-208;

Keep open the pawnbroker's place of business before eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) or after six o'clock p.m. (6:00 p.m.) of any day during the year, with the exception of thirty (30) days before Christmas, meaning November 25 through December 24, of each year, and then the pawnbroker may open the place of business at eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and shall be entitled to close same at nine o'clock p.m. (9:00 p.m.); provided, that any municipality that contains within its corporate limits a portion of a military reservation that is located partially within the boundary of this state and partially within the boundary of another state and that has a population of not less than fifty-three thousand (53,000) and not more than seventy-five thousand (75,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may extend the hours of operation by ordinance of the governing body beyond the hours of operation established pursuant to this subdivision (10), but the extension of hours shall not exceed the hours authorized in the closest contiguous state to the municipality; or

Enter into any pawn transaction that has a maturity date less than thirty (30) days after the date of the pawn transaction.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 12; 1989, ch. 433, § 1; 1994, ch. 539, § 2; 1995, ch. 186, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Metro pawnshop enforcement program, OAG 06-112, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (7/13/06).

45-6-213. Identification of pawnors — Procedure for misappropriated or stolen property.

When any person sells property to a pawnbroker or pledges property as security for a loan, the pawnbroker shall obtain and record the information provided for in § 45-6-209(b)(6) and obtain a statement of the pledgor that the pledgor is the lawful owner of the item, as provided in § 45-6-211(d), and have the record signed by the person from whom the pawnbroker receives the property. This record shall be made available to any law enforcement agency or officer upon request.

To obtain possession of purchased or pledged goods held by a pawnbroker which a claimant claims to be misappropriated or stolen, the claimant shall notify the pawnbroker by certified mail, return receipt requested, or in person evidenced by signed receipt, of the claimant’s claim to the purchased or pledged goods. The notice shall contain a complete and accurate description of the purchased or pledged goods and shall be accompanied by a legible copy of the applicable law enforcement agency’s report on the misappropriation or theft of such property.

The claimant and the pawnbroker shall, in good faith, attempt to resolve the claimant’s claim to the purchased or pledged goods within ten (10) days after the claimant notifies the pawnbroker pursuant to subdivision (b)(1). If, after the ten-day period, the claimant and pawnbroker do not resolve the claimant’s claim, then:

The claimant may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to order the return of the property, naming the pawnbroker as a defendant, and must serve the pawnbroker with a copy of the petition. The pawnbroker shall hold the property described in the petition until either the pawnbroker and the claimant resolve the claim, or a court specifically orders disposition of the property. The court shall waive any filing fee for the petition to recover the property, and the sheriff shall waive the service fees; or

An appropriate law enforcement official may place a hold order on the property pursuant to subsection (f).

If, after notice and a hearing, the court finds that the property was misappropriated or stolen and orders the return of the property to the claimant:

The claimant may recover from the pawnbroker the cost of the action, including the claimant's reasonable attorney's fees; and

If the conveying customer is convicted of theft or dealing in misappropriated or stolen property, the court shall order the conveying customer to repay the pawnbroker the full amount the conveying customer received from the pawnbroker for the property, plus all applicable pawn service charges;

As used in this subdivision (c)(2), the term “convicted of” includes a plea of nolo contendere to the charges or any agreement in which adjudication is withheld;

The conveying customer shall be responsible for paying all attorney fees and costs incurred by the pawnbroker in defending a replevin action or any other civil matter wherein it is found that the conveying customer has been convicted of theft or dealing in misappropriated or stolen property; and

Notwithstanding § 40-24-105, all moneys paid by the conveying customer shall be distributed in accordance with § 45-6-102.

If the court finds that the claimant failed to comply with the requirements in subsection (b) or otherwise finds against the claimant, the claimant is liable for the defendants' costs, including reasonable attorney's fees.

The sale, pledge, or delivery of tangible personal property to a pawnbroker by any person in this state is considered to be:

An agreement by the person who sells, pledges, or delivers the tangible personal property that the person is subject to the jurisdiction of a court of competent jurisdiction in all civil actions and proceedings arising out of the pledge or sale transaction filed by either a resident or nonresident plaintiff;

An appointment of the secretary of state by any nonresident of this state as that person's lawful attorney and agent upon whom may be served all process in suits pertaining to the actions and proceedings arising out of the sale, pledge, or delivery; and

An agreement by any nonresident that any process in any suit so served has the same legal force and validity as if personally served in this state.

When an appropriate law enforcement official has probable cause to believe that property in the possession of a pawnbroker is misappropriated or stolen, the official shall, upon expiration of the ten-day period required by subdivision (b)(2), place a written hold order on the property. The written hold order shall impose a holding period not to exceed ninety (90) days unless extended by court order. The appropriate law enforcement official may rescind, in writing, any hold order. An appropriate law enforcement official may place only one (1) hold order on the property.

Upon the expiration of the holding period, the pawnbroker shall notify, in writing, the appropriate law enforcement official by certified mail, return receipt requested, that the holding period has expired. If, on the tenth day after the written notice has been received by the appropriate law enforcement official, the pawnbroker has not received from a court an extension of the hold order on the property and the property is not the subject of a proceeding under this subsection (g), title to the property shall vest in and be deemed conveyed by operation of law to the pawnbroker, free of any liability for claims but subject to any restrictions contained in the pawn transaction contract and subject to this section.

A hold order must specify:

The name and address of the pawnbroker;

The name, title, and identification number of the representative of the appropriate law enforcement official or the court placing the hold order;

If applicable, the name and address of the appropriate law enforcement official or court to which such representative is attached and the number, if any, assigned to the claim regarding the property;

A complete description of the property to be held, including model number and serial number if applicable;

The name of the person reporting the property to be misappropriated or stolen unless otherwise prohibited by law;

The mailing address of the pawnbroker where the property is held;

The expiration date of the holding period.

The pawnbroker or the pawnbroker's representative must sign and date a copy of the hold order as evidence of receipt of the hold order and the beginning of the ninety-day holding period.

Except as provided in subdivision (j)(2), a pawnbroker may not release or dispose of property subject to a hold order except pursuant to a court order, a written release from the appropriate law enforcement official, or the expiration of the holding period of the hold order.

While a hold order is in effect, the pawnbroker shall, upon request, release the property subject to the hold order to the custody of the appropriate law enforcement official for use in a criminal investigation. The release of the property to the custody of the appropriate law enforcement official is not considered a waiver or release of the pawnbroker's property rights or interest in the property. Upon completion of the criminal proceeding, the property must be returned to the pawnbroker unless the court orders other disposition. When such other disposition is ordered, the court shall additionally order the conveying customer to pay restitution to the pawnbroker in the amount received by the conveying customer for the property together with reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 13; 1995, ch. 186, § 10; 2012, ch. 874, § 1; 2016, ch. 862, §§ 2-4.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §45-6-213(b), by authorizing a law enforcement officer to seize and dispose of property in a pawnbroker's possession without any prior notice and opportunity for the pawnbroker to defend its ownership of the property, violates the due process requirements of the Tennessee and United States Constitutions, OAG 02-090, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (8/27/02).

In light of the opinions of the United States Court of Appeals for the 10th Circuit, there is a risk that the defense of qualified immunity might not be available for a law enforcement official sued by a pawnbroker for violating its due process rights by enforcing T.C.A. §45-6-213, OAG 02-090, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (8/27/02).

45-6-214. Right to redeem.

Except as otherwise provided by this part, any person presenting a pawn ticket to the pawnbroker may be presumed to be entitled to redeem the pledged goods described in the pawn ticket.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 14.

45-6-215. Safekeeping of pledges — Insurance coverage.

Every pawnbroker licensed under this part shall provide a safe place for the keeping of the pledges provided by the pawnbroker, and shall have sufficient insurance coverage on the property held on the pledge for the benefit of the pledgor, to pay the stated value as recited on the pawn stub of the pawned article, in case of destruction by fire or other catastrophe, and the policy shall be made payable, in the case of loss, to the city or county clerk for the benefit of the pledgor, as the pledgor's interest may appear, which policy shall be deposited with the city or county clerk. “Pawn value,” for the purposes of this section, means the amount of money loaned on the particular article, as stated on the pawn ticket and in the stub book, as recited under §45-6-209(b)(3).

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 15.

45-6-216. Information concerning suppliers.

Upon request from any law enforcement agency, whether city, county, or state, a pawnbroker shall furnish the names of all suppliers from whom the pawnbroker has purchased merchandise for resale. This information is not to be recorded nor sent to any law enforcement agency but shall be maintained at the pawnshop for a period of at least one (1) year from the date of purchase.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 16.

45-6-217. Sign over entrance.

Every licensee under this part shall cause the name of the pawnbroker, firm or corporation, with the words, “Licensed Pawnbroker” to be printed or painted, in large, legible characters, and placed over the outside of the door or entrance of the shop, office, or place of business.

Acts 1988, ch, 724, § 17.

45-6-218. Penalties.

Every person, firm or corporation, or agents or employees thereof, who knowingly violates any of this part, on conviction, commits a Class A misdemeanor. If the violation is by an owner or major stockholder and/or managing partner of the pawnshop, and the violation is knowingly committed by the owner, major stockholder or managing partner of the pawnshop, then the license of the pawnbroker or pawnbrokers may be suspended or revoked at the discretion of the city or county clerk.

Subsection (a) does not apply to violations of § 45-6-212(7) relating to the taking of any article in pawn, pledge or as security under any buy-sell agreement from any person that is known to the pawnbroker to be stolen. Any violation under § 45-6-212(7) shall be prosecuted pursuant to § 39-14-103.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 18; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1996, ch. 675, § 47.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Classification of offenses, §40-35-110.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 89-53, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (4/10/89).

45-6-219. Authority of counties, incorporated municipalities, cities and taxing districts to regulate.

Counties, incorporated municipalities, cities and taxing districts in this state have the authority by ordinance to adopt provisions of this part and have the authority to adopt further rules and regulations that the legislative bodies of the counties, incorporated municipalities, cities and taxing districts may deem right and proper. No county, incorporated municipality, city or taxing district has the authority to:

Regulate interest, fees and insurance charges;

Regulate hours;

Regulate the nature of the business or types of pawn transactions;

Regulate license requirements;

Require reports or pawn tickets providing identification, information or descriptions different from that required in § 45-6-209; or

Require a pawnbroker to hold over-the-counter purchase of goods that the seller does not intend to buy back for a period of more than twenty (20) business days before offering the merchandise for resale.

Counties shall have no more authority than incorporated municipalities, cities and taxing districts have under this subsection (a) in regulating pawnbrokers.

A law enforcement official from any county, municipality, city or taxing district may not charge a pawnbroker, firm or corporation a fee for receiving, reviewing or processing daily reports or pawn tickets as defined in § 45-6-209, or any other information required by the law enforcement official.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 19; 1995, ch. 186, §§ 11, 12; 1996, ch. 885, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 409, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. A city may not adopt an ordinance requiring the pledgor in a pawn transaction to place a thumbprint on the pawnbroker's copy of the pawn transaction, OAG 00-071, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (4/11/00).

A city does not have authority, by ordinance, to require the pledgor in a pawn transaction to place a thumbprint on a form separate from the pawn ticket to be maintained by the pawnbroker and made available to law enforcement authorities, OAG 00-167, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170 (10/26/00).